Utah statutes.
31A-41-103.   Authority to take disciplinary action not limited.
(1)  This chapter does not limit the authority of the commissioner or the
commission to take disciplinary action against a title insurance licensee for
a violation of this title or rules made by the department or commission under
this title.
(2)  The repayment in full of obligations to the fund by a title insurance
licensee does not nullify or modify the effect of another disciplinary
proceeding brought pursuant to this title or rules and regulations made by the
department or commission under this title.
